Massachusetts, session 194th, H5564.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The charter of the town of Bellingham, as set forth in section 1 of chapter
400 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking Article 6-2-1 in its entirety and inserting
in place thereof the following :-
"6-2-1. The chief financial officer may also serve as the town accountant in accordance
with sections 55 to 61A, inclusive, of chapter 41 of the General Laws."
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1